California statutes. Public Utilities Code
“Operator” also means the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission for operation of commuter rail services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

99211.

“Public transportation system” means any system of an operator which provides transportation services to the general public by any vehicle which operates on land or water, regardless of whether operated separated from or in conjunction with other vehicles.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99211.5.

“Ridesharing services” means a comprehensive organizational effort which is designed to reduce the number of vehicles on the highways during peak travel periods within a defined area by encouraging the planning and marketing of high-occupancy vehicle facilities, increases in the number of passengers per vehicle in vehicles used for ridesharing, alternative work schedules, and other transportation demand management strategies among employers and commuters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1143, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99212.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 507.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

99213.

“Transit district” means a public district organized pursuant to state law and designated in the enabling legislation as a transit district or a rapid transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99214.

(a) “Transportation planning agency” means the entity designated in Section 29532 of the Government Code.

(b) “Transportation planning agency” also includes, for purposes of this chapter, the county transportation commissions created in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, and Ventura pursuant to Division 12
 (commencing with Section 130000).

(c) “Transportation planning agency” also includes, for purposes of this chapter, the Imperial County Transportation Commission in Imperial County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 8.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99215.

“Transit development board” means a public entity created pursuant to state law and designated in the enabling legislation as a transit development board, including, solely for purposes of submission of claims, receipt of funds, separate annual reporting to the Controller, and provision of service as an operator under this chapter, any nonprofit corporation or other legal entity wholly owned or controlled by the transit development board which operates a public transportation system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 864, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99217.

“Urbanized area” means such an area as defined by Section 101 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Findings and Declarations [99220. - 99222.]

99220.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Public transportation is an essential component of the balanced transportation system which must be maintained and developed so as to permit the efficient and orderly movement of people and goods in the urban areas of the state. Because public transportation systems provide an essential public service, it is
 desirable that such systems be designed and operated in such a manner as to encourage maximum utilization of the efficiencies of the service for the benefit of the total transportation system of the state and all the people of the state, including the elderly, the disabled, the youth, and the citizens of limited means.

(b) The fostering, continuance, and development of public transportation systems are a matter of state concern. Excessive reliance on the private automobile for transportation has caused air pollution and traffic congestion in California’s urban areas, and such pollution and congestion are not confined to single incorporated areas but affect entire regions. Furthermore, public transportation systems which are not designed so as to be usable by disabled persons foster increased welfare costs and the waste of human resources. Thus, the Legislature has elected to deal with the multiple problems caused by lack of adequate public
 transportation on a regional basis through the counties, with coordination of the programs being the responsibility of the state pursuant to contract with county governments.

(c) While providing county assistance to a particular transportation system may not be of primary interest and benefit to each and every taxpayer in a county, providing an integrated and coordinated system to meet the public transportation needs of an entire county will benefit the county as a whole. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for such systems in those counties where they are needed.

(d) The local transportation funds authorized by Article 11 (commencing with Section 29530) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code are made possible by the imposition of the state’s sales and use taxes on motor vehicle fuel, which allows for a reduction in state taxes without a
 corresponding loss in revenue. By authorizing counties to increase their sales and use taxes, an additional source of revenue has been made available for public transportation within such counties. Applicants for a disbursement from a local transportation fund shall only be eligible for an allocation from the fund of the county in which such transportation is provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 9.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99221.

It is the intent of the Legislature to improve existing public transportation services and encourage regional public transportation coordination. The Legislature recognizes that in the Southern California Rapid Transit District a unique factual situation exists where several municipal bus systems are providing essential local transportation services within the operating territory of the district, which was created by the
 Legislature to provide areawide coordinated public transportation services. Within the Southern California Rapid Transit District, as with all transportation service improvements in the County of Los Angeles, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall be the governmental entity responsible to establish a unified or officially coordinated public transportation system as part of the comprehensively planned development of the urban area. Both the Southern California Rapid Transit District and the included municipalities that operate bus systems within the jurisdiction of the district are permitted to file claims pursuant to this chapter upon the local transportation fund of the County of Los Angeles; provided, however, any approved claim shall not be allowed for the purpose of the establishment by the included municipal operator after January 1, 1980, of new transportation services that do not meet the criteria established by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority
 for the development of new services. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Southern California Rapid Transit District should not be inhibited in its effort to improve transit services within the region by the expansion outside the reserved service areas of the several municipal bus systems of the involved municipalities. The policy of the Legislature is that new services to meet public transportation needs outside of the municipalities presently operating bus systems which do not compete with, or divert patronage from, an existing operating bus system of an included municipal applicant under Section 99280, shall be provided and controlled by the Southern California Rapid Transit District, in complete cooperation and coordination with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, in its role as the responsible public agency for providing public transportation systems and facilities within the region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 7.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

99222.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) It is in the interest of the state that funds available for transit development be fully expended to meet the transit needs that exist in California.

(b) Such funds be expended for physical improvement to improve the movement of transit vehicles, the comfort of the patrons, and the exchange of patrons from one transportation mode to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Local Transportation Funds [99230. - 99251.]

99230.

The designated transportation planning agency shall, from an analysis and evaluation of the total amount anticipated to be available in the local transportation fund and the relative needs of each claimant for the purposes for which the fund is intended, and consistent with the provisions of this chapter, annually determine the amount to be allocated to each claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99231.

(a) All operators and city or county governments with responsibility for providing municipal services to a given area collectively may file claims for only those moneys that represent that area’s apportionment.

(b) The term “apportionment” has reference to that
 proportion of the total annual revenue anticipated to be received in the fund that the population of the area bears to the total population of the county.

(c) The term “area” means:

(1) With reference to a transit district, the entire area stated in its enabling legislation or franchise, excluding cities therein which have retained the right to join the district at a later time.

(2) With reference to a transit development board, the entire area stated in its enabling legislation, including the municipalities therein which operated bus systems prior to the creation of the board and subsequently conveyed those systems to the board.

(3) With reference to a county government, the unincorporated area of the county.

(4) With reference to a city government, the corporate area of the city.

(5) With reference to the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda and Contra Costa, the unincorporated area thereof (and with reference to a city in those counties, the corporate area of the city) which is outside the area of the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District and which is not receiving adequate local public transportation services, as determined by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99207.

(6) (A) Where a transit district, a transit development board, or a county or city, provides public transportation services beyond its boundaries, its area, for purposes of this section, shall also include:

(i) All of that area within one-half mile of any route which extends beyond its boundaries.

(ii) All of the corporate area of a city to which it provides those services pursuant to contract or prior express authority of the secretary.

(B) The transportation planning agency may rely, in its determination of populations, on estimates which are used by the Controller for distributing
 money to cities under Section 2107 of the Streets and Highways Code and to counties under Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and may contract with the Department of Finance or other appropriate state agency for an annual determination of those population estimates as may be necessary.

(7) With reference to the County of Riverside, the area within the jurisdiction of the transit operator established by the joint exercise of powers of one or more cities and the County of Riverside. The area within the jurisdiction of the transit operator shall be as it existed on January 1, 1981, as determined by the Riverside County Transportation Commission.

(8) With reference to the County of San Bernardino, the area within the jurisdiction of the transit operator established by the joint exercise of powers of one or more cities, including the most populous city, and the County of San Bernardino. The area within the jurisdiction of the transit operator shall be as it existed on January 1, 1985, as determined by the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission.

(9) With reference to the County of Monterey, the area including the Correctional Training Facility, even if annexed by the City of Soledad.

(10) With reference to the County of Del Norte, the area including the Pelican Bay State Prison, even if annexed by the City of Crescent City.

(11) With reference to the County of Imperial, the area including the Calipatria State Prison, even if annexed by the City of Calipatria.

(12) With reference to the County of Riverside, the area including the Chuckawalla Valley State Prison, even if annexed by the City of Blythe.

(13) With reference to the County of Imperial, the area including the California State Prison, Centinela, even if annexed by either the City of El Centro or the City of Imperial.

(14) With reference to the County of Madera, the area including the Central California Women’s Facility and the Valley State Prison, even if annexed by the City of Chowchilla.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 14.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

99231.2.

Except in the County of Los Angeles, the transportation planning agency, notwithstanding Section 99231, may approve the claim filed for an unincorporated area by an operator which is serving that area pursuant to a contract with the county, even though the amount of the claim exceeds the apportionment for the area, if the amount is approved by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.

For counties with a population of 500,000 or more, as determined by the 1970 federal decennial census, but excluding counties with more than 4,500 miles of maintained county roads as of 1970, the amount representing the apportionments of the areas of all operators shall be available solely for claims for Section 99234 purposes and for Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) purposes, and any of those moneys not allocated in any year shall be available for those claims in subsequent years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1055, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 99232, for each county with a population of less than 500,000 as of the 1970 federal decennial census, but with a population of 500,000 or more as of the 2000 federal decennial census, or a county whose population is 500,000 or more at a subsequent decennial census, the apportionment to the areas within the urbanized areas of the county, as defined for purposes of the 2000 federal decennial census and each census thereafter, shall be
 available solely for claims for Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) purposes. In a county subject to this section, the apportionment for areas outside of the urbanized area of the county may be used for claims for Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260), Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275), and Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) purposes, providing that allocations under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) shall be subject to the unmet needs process as prescribed by Section 99401.5.

(b) The apportionment attributable to the unincorporated area within an urbanized area shall be determined by the proportion that the urbanized area’s unincorporated area population bears to the total unincorporated population times the total apportionment attributable to the unincorporated area.

(c) For a county that is
 subject to this section, this section shall not apply to that county until July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   (SB 716)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 99232.1, a city with a population of 100,000 or fewer within an urbanized area in a county subject to Section 99232.1 is not required to expend all of its apportionment for Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) purposes.

(b) The population of cities within an urbanized area shall be based on
 the city and county population estimates published annually by the Department of Finance.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude a city with a population of 100,000 or fewer within an urbanized area in a county subject to Section 99232.1 from expending all of its apportionment for Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) purposes.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   (SB 716)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 99231, and subject to subdivision (a) of Section 99232.5, the apportionment area for the Sacramento Regional Transit District includes all of the incorporated and unincorporated area of the County of Sacramento, excluding cities in the county that have retained the right to join the district at a later time. However, the apportionment restriction in Section 99232 only applies to the area of the Sacramento Regional Transit District described in subdivision (a) of Section 99231.

(b) (1) The Sacramento Regional Transit District may file a claim under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400), but not under Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260), for the apportionment not subject to Section 99232 and subdivision (a) of Section 99232.5.

(2) The County of Sacramento may also file a claim under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) for the apportionment not subject to the restriction in Section 99232. However, a claim for the purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 99400 shall not be approved unless it is determined by the Sacramento Area Council of Governments, at a public hearing for which 15 days’ notice has been given pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, that there are no unmet transit needs, as defined in Section 99401.5, within the area of the Sacramento Regional Transit District described under subdivision (a) of
 Section 99231.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 250, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Section operative July 1, 1994, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 99232, cities within the County of Sacramento which are outside the activated boundaries of the Sacramento Regional Transit District, but which provide transit service or which contract with the district for transit service, may also file claims under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) if it is determined by the Sacramento Area Council of Governments, at a public hearing for which 15 days’ notice has been given pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, that the transit needs of these cities
 can be met with use of an amount less than the total apportionment of these cities.

(b) With respect to such a city, not less than 25 percent of its apportionment shall be allocated for Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 250, Sec. 2.1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.6.

Notwithstanding Section 99232, the County of San Diego may also file claims under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) for an unincorporated area not served by the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board or the North San Diego County Transit Development Board if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The San Diego Association of Governments, at a public hearing for which 15 days’ notice has been given pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, finds that the transit needs of that unincorporated area can be met by using an amount less than the apportionment for
 that unincorporated area.

(b) The county board of supervisors concurs in that finding.

(c) An equal amount from the apportionment for the unincorporated area served by the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board has been claimed for transit capital projects that are mutually agreed upon by the county and San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board.

A claim for a transit capital project pursuant to subdivision (c) may be made by the county or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, or jointly, as specified by mutual agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99232.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 99232.1 and 99401.5, any local transportation fund apportionments available to the Ventura County Transportation Commission for the City of Thousand Oaks may be allocated for local streets and roads.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 99232.1 and 99401.5, any local transportation fund apportionments available to the Ventura County Transportation Commission for the City of Thousand Oaks may be allocated for claims under Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 46, Sec. 3.   (SB 848)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.

Except as provided in Section 99233.11, the fund shall be allocated by the designated transportation planning agency for the purposes specified in Sections 99233.1 to 99233.9, inclusive, in the sequence provided in those sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.1.

There shall be allocated to the county and the transportation planning agency such sums as are necessary to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), there shall be allocated to the transportation planning agency, if it is statutorily created, such sums as it may approve, up to 3 percent of annual revenues, for the conduct of the transportation planning and programming process, unless a greater amount is approved by the director.

(b) (1) In those areas that have a county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050, up to 1 percent of annual revenues shall be allocated to the commission in Los Angeles County, and up to 3 percent of the annual revenues shall be allocated to the commissions in Orange, Riverside, and San Bernardino Counties for the transportation planning and programming process. Of the funds allocated to the commission in Riverside County, one-half shall be allocated for planning studies within the Western Riverside County and the Coachella Valley areas, as determined by the commission.

(2) In the area of the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, as defined in Section 130004, up to three-fourths of 1 percent of annual revenues shall be allocated by the appropriate entities, proportionately, on or before each July 1, to the multicounty
 designated transportation planning agency for the transportation planning and programming process. No operator shall grant any funds it receives under this chapter to the designated multicounty transportation planning agency for purposes of the agency carrying out its responsibilities under Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000).

(c) In Ventura County, up to 2 percent of the annual revenues shall be allocated to the Ventura County Transportation Commission for the transportation planning and programming process.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 530, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 206.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative July 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.3.

Two percent of the remaining money in the fund shall be made available to counties and cities for facilities provided for the exclusive use of pedestrians and bicycles unless the transportation planning agency finds that the money could be used to better advantage for the purposes stated in Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275), or for local street and road purposes in those areas where the money may be expended for those purposes, in the development of a balanced transportation system. Of the amount made available to a city or county pursuant to this section,
 5 percent thereof may be expended to supplement moneys from other sources to fund bicycle and pedestrian safety education programs, but shall not be used to fully fund the salary of any one person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.4.

Allocations shall be made for rail passenger service operations and capital improvements pursuant to Section 99234.5, 99234.7, or 99234.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 995, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.5.

Up to 10 percent of the remaining money for the area under the jurisdiction of a transit development board created pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 120000) shall be allocated to the transit development board and the transportation planning agency to carry out administrative and planning powers, duties, and functions and construction and acquisition programs in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 132353) of Chapter 3 of Division 12.7.

Thereafter, the remaining money for allocation in
 that area shall be allocated by the transportation planning agency to claimants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.7.

Up to 5 percent of the remaining money in the fund shall be made available to cities, counties, and operators for claims filed pursuant to Article 4. 5 (commencing with Section 99275) in those areas where claims may not be filed for those purposes specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400), and may be made available to consolidated transportation service agencies, unless the transportation planning agency, or a county transportation commission created pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000), having jurisdiction finds, after considering the claims pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99275.5,
 that the allocations of money could be used to better advantage for the purposes stated in Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) in the development of a balanced transportation system.

The money may be allocated without respect to Section 99231 and shall not be included in determining the apportionment to a city or county for purposes of Sections 99233.8 and 99233.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective June 9, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.8.

There shall be allocated to operators such money as is approved by the transportation planning agency for claims presented pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.9.

There shall be allocated to counties and cities such money as is approved by the transportation planning agency for claims presented pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.10.

Notwithstanding Section 99233.7, funds made available in the County of Santa Barbara for claims filed pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) may be included in determining the apportionment to a city, county, or operator for purposes of Sections 99233.8 and 99233.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 226, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.11.

Funds made available to the County of Stanislaus and the cities in that county shall be allocated in the following order:

(a) To the Stanislaus Area Association of Governments, the County of Stanislaus, and the cities in that county, an amount deemed necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(b) To the Stanislaus Area Association of Governments, an amount approved by that association, but not more than 3 percent of annual
 revenues, to conduct the transportation planning and programming process, unless a greater amount is approved by the director.

(c) To pedestrian and bicycle facilities, not more than 2 percent of the funds remaining, in accordance with Section 99233.3.

(d) To the Stanislaus Area Association of Governments, an amount deemed necessary for intracity, intercity, and interregional transit services and rail passenger services, when a claim is filed under Section 99234.9, Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260), or Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400), consistent with the cost-sharing criteria approved by the association. Apportionments and allocations from those funds made by the association to the county and the cities in the county also shall be in accordance with the cost-sharing criteria approved by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 45, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

99233.12.

Notwithstanding anything in Sections 99233 to 99233.9, inclusive, to the contrary, the Solano Transportation Authority may file a claim, and the transportation planning agency may allocate, for the area representing the cumulative areas of the authority’s member agencies, up to 2.7 percent of annual revenues for countywide transit planning and coordination purposes relative to Solano County. Funds allocated to the
 authority pursuant to this section shall be allocated after allocations are made pursuant to Sections 99233.1 and 99233.2 but prior to other allocations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 10.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99234.

(a) Claims for facilities provided for the exclusive use of pedestrians and bicycles or for bicycle and pedestrian safety education programs shall be filed according to the rules and regulations adopted by the transportation planning agency.

(b) The money shall be allocated for the construction, including related engineering expenses, of those facilities pursuant to procedures or criteria established by the transportation planning agency for the area within its jurisdiction, or for bicycle and pedestrian safety education programs.

(c) The money may be allocated for the maintenance of
 bicycling
 trails that are closed to motorized traffic pursuant to procedures or criteria established by the transportation planning agency for the area within its jurisdiction.

(d) The money may be allocated without respect to Section 99231 and shall not be included in determining the apportionments to a city or county for purposes of Sections 99233.7 to 99233.9, inclusive.

(e) Facilities provided for the use of bicycles may include projects that serve the needs of commuting bicyclists, including, but not limited to, new trails serving major transportation corridors, secure bicycle parking at employment centers, park and ride lots, and transit terminals where other funds are unavailable.

(f) Notwithstanding any other
 provision of this section, a planning agency established in Title 7.1 (commencing with Section 66500) of the Government Code may allocate the money to the Association of Bay Area Governments for activities required by Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 5850) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the transportation planning agencies that allocate funds, pursuant to this section, to the cities and counties with jurisdiction or a sphere of influence within the delta, as defined in Section 5852 of the Public Resources Code, may allocate the money to the Delta Protection Commission for activities required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 5852) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code.

(h) Within 30 days
 after receiving a request for a review from any city or county, the transportation planning agency shall review its allocations made pursuant to Section 99233.3.

(i) In addition to the purposes authorized in this section, a portion of the amount available to a city or county pursuant to Section 99233.3 may be allocated to develop a comprehensive bicycle and pedestrian facilities plan, with an emphasis on bicycle projects intended to accommodate bicycle commuters rather than recreational bicycle users. An allocation under this subdivision may not be made more than once every five years.

(j) Up to 20 percent of the amount available each year to a city or county pursuant to Section 99233.3 may be allocated to restripe class II bicycle lanes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.   (SB 508)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

99234.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260), the Orange County Transportation Commission may allocate funds from either the Orange County Unified Transportation Trust, as defined in Section 99301.6, or from the principal upon which the interest is accruing to the Department of Transportation for construction of high-occupancy vehicle lanes within freeways in the county. In the event high-occupancy vehicle lanes constructed with the funds are subsequently converted to mixed flow use, the local transportation fund shall be reimbursed through the State Transportation Improvement Program process the
 amount of funds provided to the department for construction of the lanes pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 951, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99234.5.

(a) The Counties of San Bernardino, Riverside, and Los Angeles may enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500), Chapter 5, Division 7, Title 1 of the Government Code, and the joint powers entity created pursuant to such agreement shall in accordance with Section 403 of the Rail Passenger Service Act of 1970 (45 U.S.C. 563), request the National Railroad Passenger Corporation to institute up to two additional trains a day in each direction between Los Angeles and San Bernardino to supplement the present level of service. The joint powers entity may request institution of more than two
 additional trains a day in each direction between Los Angeles and San Bernardino. Contributions shall be made from the fund of each of the three counties, as agreed by them, to the joint powers entity, as may be required by the National Railroad Passenger Corporation to meet a reasonable portion of any losses associated with such service. The joint powers entity may request that the additional trains shall be operated, to the extent practicable, during periods of peak traffic.

(b) If the funds available under this chapter are insufficient for purposes of subdivision (a), the board of supervisors of any one of the three counties may make contributions to the joint powers entity from any funds available to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

99234.7.

(a) The Department of Transportation may negotiate and contract with the appropriate railroad corporation to provide passenger rail service between the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of San Mateo and Santa Clara. In the process of negotiating the contract, the department shall take into consideration the funding available and the level of service as it has been recommended by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. Notwithstanding Section 14035 of the Government Code, the contract shall not extend beyond June 30, 1993. The California Transportation Commission shall allocate no funds pursuant to Section
 14031.6 of the Government Code for this rail passenger service after the 1992–93 fiscal year. If the department enters into a contract, it shall, on or before July 1, 1992, assign the contract to the Peninsula Corridor Study Joint Powers Board or to another local or regional agency designated by the board which is authorized to operate or contract for the operation of rail passenger service, if the board or designated agency determines that the rail passenger service shall be continued. The department shall assign its operating subsidies for the 1992–93 fiscal year for that service to the board or that designated agency. Within the area of jurisdiction of the board, the board or that designated agency may acquire from the department all property owned or leased by the department for that rail passenger service, including, but not limited to, stations, facilities, equipment, and rights-of-way, and this transfer shall be consistent with the process defined in Section 160006. The California Transportation
 Commission shall not allocate state funds to purchase the San Francisco Peninsula commuter rail service right-of-way unless a local agency assumes operation and control of the commuter rail service on or before June 30, 1993. This section does not prohibit the commission from making a multiyear funding commitment to purchase the right-of-way subject to that assumption of operation and control occurring on or before that date.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a transit district or county may negotiate and contract with the appropriate railroad corporation to provide passenger rail service which is to be primarily operated within its jurisdiction. Adjacent transit districts or counties may jointly negotiate and contract with the appropriate railroad corporation to provide passenger rail service which is to be primarily operated within their jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1283, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

99234.9.

Any county, city, county transportation commission, or operator may file claims with the transportation planning agency for rail passenger service operation expenditures and capital improvement expenditures, including construction and maintenance of intermodal transportation facilities. These funds may be used as the entity’s required contribution toward the cost of providing these services or capital improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

99235.

Upon having determined the allocation of each claimant on the fund, the transportation planning agency shall convey such information to each claimant and the county auditor, together with one allocation instruction for each claimant advising the auditor as to the time and the nature of payment.

Such instruction may call for a single payment, for payment as moneys become available, or for payment by installments monthly, quarterly, or otherwise. The allocation and instruction may be rescinded and revised by the transportation planning agency only under one of the following circumstances:

(a) An appeal has been filed.
